Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-721
Attorney General; powers.

(a) If the Attorney General determines that the support enforcement agency is neglecting or refusing to provide services to an individual, the Attorney General may order the agency to perform its duties under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act or may provide those services directly to the individual.

(b) The Attorney General may determine that a foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with this state and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

Laws 1993, LB 500, § 21;

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 61;

Laws 2015, LB415, § 20.